Wisconsin, session 2025, AB724.
do enact as follows:AB724,11Section 1. 301.03 (17m) of the statutes is created to read:AB724,2,42301.03 (17m) Establish and maintain on the department’s website an 3interactive reporting system that is updated no less frequently than every 72 hours 4and that reports all of the following for each state correctional institution:AB724,2,65(a) The total number of complaints filed about that state correctional 6institution in the current calendar year.AB724,2,117(b) For every complaint filed about the state correctional institution, all 8complaint data, disaggregated, in a format that is searchable by each category of 9information contained in the complaint and that does not contain any personally 10identifying information for an inmate or employee of the state correctional 11institution.AB724,212Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB724,2,1513(1) The reporting system required under s. 301.03 (17m) shall be operable by 14no later than the first day of the 7th month beginning after the effective date of this 15subsection.AB724,316Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB724,3,217(1) Reporting system for complaints regarding state correctional 18institutions. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the 19department of corrections under s. 20.410 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 202025-26 is increased by $70,000 to establish and operate the reporting system 21under s. 301.03 (17m). In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to 22the department of corrections under s. 20.410 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal 1year 2026-27 is increased by $30,000 to operate the reporting system under s. 2301.03 (17m).AB724,3,33